Wyoming statutes. Title 27 Labor and Employment
Article 1. Generally
§ 27-14-104.
Exclusive remedy as to employer; nonliability of co-employees; no relief from liability; rights as to delinquent or noncontributing employer.

The rights and remedies provided in this act for an employee including any joint employee, and his dependents for injuries incurred in extrahazardous employments are in lieu of all other rights and remedies against any employer and any joint employer making contributions required by this act, or their employees acting within the scope of their employment unless the employees intentionally act to cause physical harm or injury to the injured employee, but do not supersede any rights and remedies available to an employee and his dependents against any other person.

No contract, rule, regulation or device shall operate to relieve an employer from any liability created by this act except as otherwise provided by this act.

This act does not limit or affect any right or action by any employee and his dependents against an employer for injuries received while employed by the employer when the employer at the time of the injuries has not qualified under this act for the coverage of his eligible employees, or having qualified, has not paid the required premium on an injured employee’s earnings within thirty (30) days of the date due. When an employee’s employment starts within the same month as the injury, the status of delinquency or not contributing shall not apply until after the regular payroll reporting date.

History.

Laws 1986, Sp. Sess., ch. 3, § 3; 1989, ch. 226, § 1; 1993, ch. 47, § 1; 1995, ch. 205, § 1.

Cross references. —

For general provision that contracts exempting employer from liability shall be void, see §

27-1-105

.

As to action against third party liable for damages for injury, see §

27-14-105

.

For constitutional provision that damages for personal injuries or death shall not be limited, see art. 10, § 4, Wyo. Const.

For provision prohibiting contracts exempting employer from liability for personal injuries, see art. 19, § 7, Wyo. Const.

Meaning of “this act.” —

See note under same catchline following §

27-14-101

.

Constitutionality. —

The provision for extrahazardous employment herein was not unreasonable classification under art. 1, § 34, Wyo. Const.Ideal Bakery v. Schryver, 43 Wyo. 108, 299 P. 284,

1931 Wyo. LEXIS 13

(Wyo. 1931).

Subsection (a) is constitutional. Meyer v. Kendig, 641 P.2d 1235,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 310

(Wyo. 1982).

A rational basis exists for treating the employer differently from his employees with respect to the extent of immunity under subsection (a). Mauch v. Stanley Structures, 641 P.2d 1247,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 309

(Wyo. 1982); Parker v. Energy Dev. Co., 691 P.2d 981,

1984 Wyo. LEXIS 350

(Wyo. 1984).

This section, which extends the immunity of employers to co-employees acting within the scope of their employment, is unconstitutional as a violation of equal protection because it infringes the fundamental right of access to the courts. Mills v. Reynolds, 837 P.2d 48,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 92

(Wyo. 1992) (decided prior to 1993 amendment).

The district court erred in its dismissal order of plaintiff's wrongful death action against her deceased husband's co-employees because the retroactive application of Mills v. Reynolds, 837 P.2d 48,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 92

(Wyo. 1992) to this section renders its statutory grant of co-employee absolute immunity unconstitutional. McKennan v. Newman, 843 P.2d 602,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 190

(Wyo. 1992) (decided prior to the 1993 amendment).

This section, which, under the Wyoming worker's compensation scheme, granted immunity from suits by co-employees to employees who were acting within the scope of their employment, is unconstitutional because it violated the Wyoming Constitution's guarantee of equal protection. Mills v. Reynolds, 837 P.2d 48,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 92

(Wyo. 1992) (decided prior to the 1993 amendment).

Liability of co-employee for intentional, unreasonable, act.—

While two co-employee supervisors were entitled to judgment as a matter of law on employee’s injury claim because the employee failed to establish any genuine issues of material fact as to whether the supervisors willfully disregarded the need to act despite awareness that a machine could cause serious injury or death, a third co-employee supervisor was not entitled to judgment as a matter of law because the facts as to whether the supervisor’s inaction was willful or merely inadvertent were in genuine dispute and were to be decided by a jury. Ramirez v. Brown, 2020 WY 79, 466 P.3d 285,

2020 Wyo. LEXIS 89

(Wyo. 2020).

Worker's compensation laws were enacted as a form of industrial insurance

for victims of industrial accidents, regardless of any fault or breach of duty on the part of the employer. Meyer v. Kendig, 641 P.2d 1235,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 310

(Wyo. 1982).

Construction. —

Concept of willful and wanton misconduct has essentially the same legal effect as the language “intentionally act to cause physical harm or injury” in Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 27-14-104(a).
Formisano v. Gaston, 2011 WY 8, 246 P.3d 286,

2011 Wyo. LEXIS 9

(Wyo. 2011).

Subsection (a) limits actions brought by surviving relatives or administratrix

of deceased's estate. Mauch v. Stanley Structures, 641 P.2d 1247,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 309

(Wyo. 1982).

Immunity from suit exists for employer contributing to worker's compensation fund

without regard to negligence, whether culpable or ordinary. Mauch v. Stanley Structures, 641 P.2d 1247,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 309

(Wyo. 1982).

“Contract for hire” unnecessary for “employer” status. —

The existence of a “contract for hire” is not a necessary prerequisite to a defendant's status as an “employer” for purposes of workers' compensation immunity. In the absence of a joint employment dispute, an employee who agrees to be “employed” without a contract but is mistaken about the identity of his actual employer is not necessarily prejudiced, but must affirmatively demonstrate either that the employee suffered harm because of being mistaken about the identity of his employer, or that his mistake about the employer's identity was due to bad faith or fraud by the employer. Clark v. Industrial Co., 818 P.2d 626,

1991 Wyo. LEXIS 154

(Wyo. 1991).

Contributing employer's immunity is absolute

regardless of whether its behavior amounted to culpable negligence or an intentional tort. Wessel v. Mapco, Inc., 752 P.2d 1363,

1988 Wyo. LEXIS 38

(Wyo. 1988), reh'g denied,

1988 Wyo. LEXIS 72

(Wyo. Apr. 26, 1988).

Section does not limit or affect right of action against unqualified employer. —

The clear import of this section is that, when an employer is not qualified under this chapter at the time of injury to an employee, the employer has no immunity. Robinson v. Bell, 767 P.2d 177,

1989 Wyo. LEXIS 11

(Wyo. 1989).

Immunity not available to noncontributing parent company. —

Immunity from suit based on worker's compensation laws is not available to the parent company (of the subsidiary corporation-employer) that does not contribute to the fund. Fiscus v. Atlantic Richfield Co., 742 P.2d 198,

1987 Wyo. LEXIS 505

(Wyo. 1987).

A parent corporation, as not being an employer contributing to the fund, may be liable in tort if it exercises operational control of activities of its subsidiary. Wessel v. Mapco, Inc., 752 P.2d 1363,

1988 Wyo. LEXIS 38

(Wyo. 1988), reh'g denied,

1988 Wyo. LEXIS 72

(Wyo. Apr. 26, 1988).

Single employer paying through joint account entitled to immunity. —

A single employer that makes its payments to the worker's compensation fund through a joint account entered into with other affiliated business entities is considered to have made its contributions as required by law and is entitled to the immunity set forth in this chapter. Lankford v. True Ranches, 822 P.2d 868,

1991 Wyo. LEXIS 194

(Wyo. 1991).

Immunity from suit does not include federal civil rights action. —

The exclusive remedy of the state workers' compensation statutes does not bar recovery against an employer under 42 USCS § 1983, the federal civil rights statute. Rosa v. Cantrell, 705 F.2d 1208, 1982 U.S. App. LEXIS 23413 (10th Cir. Wyo. 1982), cert. denied, 464 U.S. 821, 104 S. Ct. 85, 78 L. Ed. 2d 94, 1983 U.S. LEXIS 1117 (U.S. 1983).

The exclusive nature of the remedy is between employee and employer. —

Pittsburgh-Des Moines Steel Co. v. American Surety Co., 365 F.2d 412, 1966 U.S. App. LEXIS 5134 (10th Cir. Wyo. 1966).

As a general proposition, the exclusive remedy of the Wyoming workmen's (now worker's) compensation laws is the only remedy available unless the employment was unlawful or illegal. Jordan v. Delta Drilling Co., 541 P.2d 39,

1975 Wyo. LEXIS 169

(Wyo. 1975), overruled, Wetering v. Eisele, 682 P.2d 1055,

1984 Wyo. LEXIS 296

(Wyo. 1984).

Covered employer absolutely immune from all common-law tort remedies. —

Where an employee's injury occurs in a work-related situation and is in all other respects compensable, the employer is absolutely immune from all common-law tort remedies arising out of the injury to or death of the employee — including causes of action for intentional tort or culpable negligence. Parker v. Energy Dev. Co., 691 P.2d 981,

1984 Wyo. LEXIS 350

(Wyo. 1984).

Settlement not to relieve employer from liability. —

A settlement between an employer and an injured employee will not relieve the former from liability under the Workmen's (now Worker's) Compensation Law. State Farm Mut. Auto. Ins. Co. v. Petsch, 261 F.2d 331, 1958 U.S. App. LEXIS 3261 (10th Cir. 1958).

Abolition of tort actions not due process violation. —

Abolishing actions by an injured miner against his employer for negligence does not constitute a taking of property without due process of law. Jackson v. Dravo Corp., 603 F.2d 156, 1979 U.S. App. LEXIS 12565 (10th Cir. Wyo. 1979).

As benefits replace tort action. —

An injured miner whose employer has complied with the Wyoming law regarding worker's compensation does not have an independent cause of action against his employer as compensation benefits take the place thereof. Jackson v. Dravo Corp., 603 F.2d 156, 1979 U.S. App. LEXIS 12565 (10th Cir. Wyo. 1979).

Immunity provisions in Worker's Compensation Act must be narrowly construed.

Bence v. Pacific Power & Light Co., 631 P.2d 13,

1981 Wyo. LEXIS 360

(Wyo. 1981).

No immunity for surety who reimburses employer for worker's compensation payments. —

A surety, guarantor or general contractor who has contracted to reimburse an employer, who actually makes the worker's compensation payments, is not granted “statutory employer” immunity from tort liability by this section. Bence v. Pacific Power & Light Co., 631 P.2d 13,

1981 Wyo. LEXIS 360

(Wyo. 1981).

When employee protected from tort action by fellow employee. —

A supervising or managing coemployee is protected from tort action by his fellow employee if he is acting within the scope of his employment and is not culpably negligent. Abeyta v. Hensley, 595 P.2d 71,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 412

(Wyo. 1979) (decided prior to 1993 amendment).

Degree of negligence for claims against co-employees. —

For claims accruing between July 1, 1987, and February 18, 1993, culpable negligence is the degree of negligence that an injured employee must prove against a co-employee in an action to recovery damages for personal injury suffered in a work-related accident. Copp v. Redmond, 858 P.2d 1125,

1993 Wyo. LEXIS 142

(Wyo. 1993).

Culpable negligence of coemployee involves more than unreasonable conduct;

it requires the element of willfulness. Johnston v. Conoco, Inc., 758 P.2d 566,

1988 Wyo. LEXIS 99

(Wyo. 1988) (decided under former § 27-12-103).

Culpable negligence involves more than unreasonable conduct; it involves willfulness, and when a party fails to raise a genuine issue of material fact on this element, summary judgment is appropriate. Calkins v. Boydston, 796 P.2d 452,

1990 Wyo. LEXIS 94

(Wyo. 1990) (decided under former § 27-12-103).

Liability of co-employee for intentional, unreasonable, act. —

There was no genuine issue of material fact where the plaintiff presented nothing in the record that sufficed to demonstrate the plaintiff's co-employee intentionally committed an act of unreasonable character in disregard of a known or obvious risk that was so great as to make it highly probable that harm would follow. Smith v. Throckmartin, 893 P.2d 712,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 59

(Wyo. 1995).

Defendant's admitted negligence in falling asleep while driving plaintiff home from work did not rise to the level of misconduct envisioned by the exception to immunity in Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 27-14-104(a); even assuming that some of the late hours of work could have been avoided by defendant, defendant's conduct did not meet the test for co-employee liability.
Formisano v. Gaston, 2011 WY 8, 246 P.3d 286,

2011 Wyo. LEXIS 9

(Wyo. 2011).

Intentional disregard of danger. —

In a case in which plaintiff was injured while in a manrider that was being raised up in order to open a storm gate and release a tugger line, the trial court properly granted summary judgment in favor of plaintiff's co-employees. No evidence was presented showing that the co-employees had knowledge of, and intentionally disregarded, the danger associated with using the manrider to open the storm gate.
Van Patten v. Gipson, 2011 WY 98, 253 P.3d 505,

2011 Wyo. LEXIS 99

(Wyo. 2011).

Exclusivity provision did not bar co-employee liability action. —

While plaintiff employee was working to build a residence, he and a coworker got onto a wooden platform fitted with guardrails; when the man-basket came apart, plaintiff received serious injuries. After plaintiff obtained benefits from the Wyoming Worker's Compensation fund, he was permitted under an exception to this section to file a co-employee liability action against defendants, the company's owner, the general construction superintendent, and the project superintendent; after the first trial resulted in mistrial, the jury rendered a verdict for defendants.
Dollarhide v. Bancroft, 2010 WY 126, 239 P.3d 1168,

2010 Wyo. LEXIS 134

(Wyo. 2010).

Failure to correct hazard not culpable negligence. —

A situation in which a supervisory co-employee has knowledge of a hazardous condition and fails to correct it, although certainly sufficient to indicate ordinary negligence, is not sufficient to satisfy the much more stringent test of culpable negligence. Cockburn v. Terra Resources, 794 P.2d 1334,

1990 Wyo. LEXIS 73

(Wyo. 1990) (decided under former § 27-12-103).

Summary judgment appropriate where no direct supervisory control. —

Summary judgment for defendant in personal injury action brought by defendant's coemployee was appropriate where defendant did not have direct supervisory control over plaintiff, but had only a general duty to supervise and maintain a safe workplace; defendant did not possess the state of mind required to show culpable negligence, that approaching intent to do harm. Morris v. Smith, 837 P.2d 679,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 128

(Wyo. 1992) (decided under prior law).

Officer not sued where co-employee culpably negligent. —

The exclusive remedy provisions barred a miner's action against the mine manager and mine supervisors while genuine issues of fact existed as to whether other co-employees were culpably negligent and could be held liable for damages. Case v. Goss, 776 P.2d 188,

1989 Wyo. LEXIS 154

(Wyo. 1989) (decided prior to 1993 amendment).

When employee may sue corporate officer coemployee. —

These provisions do not bar an injured employee from bringing an action against a coemployee who is also a corporate officer, if that coemployee was culpably negligent and he owed the plaintiff a duty of care. Barnette v. Doyle, 622 P.2d 1349,

1981 Wyo. LEXIS 278

(Wyo. 1981) (decided prior to 1993 amendment).

Individual partner immune from suit. —

An individual partner enjoys the same immunity as the partnership from a suit by an injured partnership employee who has received worker's compensation benefits through the partnership's contribution. Brebaugh v. Hales, 788 P.2d 1128,

1990 Wyo. LEXIS 28

(Wyo. 1990).

A partnership employee who has received worker's compensation benefits for a work-related injury may not maintain a tort action against an individual partner who manages the partnership's day-to-day operations under a contract with the partnership. The managing partner is an employer for purposes of the immunity provisions of the worker's compensation law. Pool v. Dravo Coal Co., 788 P.2d 1146,

1990 Wyo. LEXIS 173

(Wyo. 1990).

Injured governmental employee covered by worker's compensation precluded from suing government in tort. —

It is only in those situations where an injured governmental employee-plaintiff is covered by worker's compensation that the exclusive-remedy provisions of the worker's compensation laws preclude a direct action in tort against the employer-governmental entity. The Worker's Compensation Act and the waiver-of-immunity provisions of the Governmental Claims Act do, however, permit the injured governmental employee to structure a claim against his or her coemployee provided the claimant can prove culpable negligence. Hamlin v. Transcon Lines, 701 P.2d 1139,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 496

(Wyo. 1985).

State not vicariously liable by reason of culpable negligence of coemployee. —

Insofar as the estate of a state employee, killed in an automobile mishap in the scope of his employment by reason of the culpable negligence of a coemployee, sought to hold the state vicariously liable, the estate failed by reasons of the exclusive-remedy provisions of the worker's compensation law. Hamlin v. Transcon Lines, 697 P.2d 606,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 466

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 701 P.2d 1139,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 496

(Wyo. 1985).

But negligent coemployee may sue for indemnification, even though receiving worker's compensation benefits. —

The worker's compensation exclusive-remedy constitutional and statutory provisions did not deny standing to a state employee, held liable for his culpably negligent acts while acting within the scope of his employment, to bring suit against the state under §

1-39-104

for indemnification, even though the employee was receiving benefits from the worker's compensation fund. Hamlin v. Transcon Lines, 697 P.2d 606,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 466

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 701 P.2d 1139,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 496

(Wyo. 1985).

Test for determining whether exclusive remedy provisions of act operate

to prevent actions against covered employers for intentional acts of employees is whether or not the claimed injury would be compensable under the act. Baker v. Wendy's of Montana, 687 P.2d 885,

1984 Wyo. LEXIS 330

(Wyo. 1984).

Showing of culpable negligence will defeat worker's claim. —

Svoboda v. Wyoming State Treasurer, 599 P.2d 1342,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 450

(Wyo. 1979) (decided under former § 27-12-103).

Culpable negligence is “willful and serious misconduct.” —

In order to prove that an actor has engaged in willful misconduct, one must demonstrate that he acted with a state of mind that approaches intent to do harm. Stundon v. Sterling, 736 P.2d 317,

1987 Wyo. LEXIS 441

(Wyo. 1987) (decided under former § 27-12-103).

In a case in which plaintiff sued his co-employees after he was injured while working as entry level floorman on a drilling rig, the trial court properly granted summary judgment in favor of the co-employees, where no genuine issues of material fact existed on the claim that the co-employees acted willfully and wantonly. No evidence was presented showing that any of the co-employees intentionally acted to cause plaintiff physical harm.
Van Patten v. Gipson, 2011 WY 98, 253 P.3d 505,

2011 Wyo. LEXIS 99

(Wyo. 2011).

But willful, wanton misconduct of coemployee is not negligence. —

Damages resulting from willful and wanton misconduct of a culpably negligent coemployee are not damages for negligence. Barnette v. Doyle, 622 P.2d 1349,

1981 Wyo. LEXIS 278

(Wyo. 1981) (decided under former § 27-12-103).

Concept of willful and wanton misconduct has essentially the same legal effect as the language “intentionally act to cause physical harm or injury” in Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 27-14-104(a).
Formisano v. Gaston, 2011 WY 8, 246 P.3d 286,

2011 Wyo. LEXIS 9

(Wyo. 2011).

Knowledge of dangerous condition is willful and wanton misconduct. —

In an miner's workplace injury suit against the supervisors following the severance of his foot by an unguarded sheave wheel, the court erred by granting the supervisors' motion for summary judgment because there were factual issues concerning the supervisors' knowledge of the general risks posed by working in the shuttle belt area, of which the sheave wheel was a part. Bertagnolli v. Louderback, 2003 WY 50, 67 P.3d 627,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 62

(Wyo. 2003).

Plaintiff's
evidence was sufficient to create a genuine issue of material fact
as to a supervisor's knowledge of a dangerous condition and whether
the supervisor acted intentionally in disregard of known risks. The
evidence was sufficient to preclude summary judgment in favor of
the
supervisor. Herrera v. Phillipps, 2014 WY 118, 334 P.3d 1225,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 135

(Wyo. 2014).

Violation of safety regulations not culpable negligence. —

In a wrongful death action alleging that the defendants were liable as culpably negligent coemployees for the death of the deceased, who died while cleaning a “frac tank,” the plaintiff relied heavily on violations of OSHA regulations concerning safety training and equipment. While these asserted violations constituted evidence of ordinary negligence, they did not demonstrate a state of mind consistent with culpable negligence, which requires knowledge or obviousness of a high probability of harm. Although both defendants were generally aware of a possibility of harm from tank fumes, there was no evidence to suggest that either man knew the degree of danger presented by the particular tank in which the deceased died. Poulos v. HPC, Inc., 765 P.2d 364,

1988 Wyo. LEXIS 166

(Wyo. 1988) (decided under former § 27-12-103).

Summary judgment appropriate for culpable negligence issue. —

Summary judgment is appropriate when a party fails to raise a genuine issue of material fact on the element of culpable negligence. Bryant v. Hornbuckle, 728 P.2d 1132,

1986 Wyo. LEXIS 643

(Wyo. 1986) (decided prior to 1993 amendment).

Wrongful death action precluded. —

Wyoming Worker's Compensation Act provided exclusive remedy for death of employee killed in mining accident, and therefore survivors and personal representative could not maintain wrongful death action against mining operator, despite allegations of negligence and safety violations by operator. Anderson v. Solvay Minerals, Inc., 3 P.3d 236,

2000 Wyo. LEXIS 71

(Wyo. 2000), overruled in part, Collins v. COP Wyo., LLC, 2016 WY 18, 366 P.3d 521,

2016 Wyo. LEXIS 18

(Wyo. 2016).

Employer immunity
under the Wyoming Worker's Compensation Act barred a wrongful death
action against the employer where an affidavit established that the
employer was the decedent's employer and had paid into the worker's
compensation fund for the decedent's coverage. Knight v. Estate of McCoy, 2015 WY 9, 341 P.3d 412,

2015 Wyo. LEXIS 9

(Wyo. 2015).

Fact that
the employer stopped payment on the decedent's paycheck had no effect
on the preclusive effect of the Wyoming Worker's Compensation Act
where the decedent's representative failed to show that the decedent
was not properly reported on the employer's payroll. Knight v. Estate of McCoy, 2015 WY 9, 341 P.3d 412,

2015 Wyo. LEXIS 9

(Wyo. 2015).

Intoxication places employee outside scope of employment. —

An allegation of intoxication while on the job is another way of saying that the worker, while in such condition, is outside the scope of his employment. Svoboda v. Wyoming State Treasurer, 599 P.2d 1342,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 450

(Wyo. 1979).

Work-related nature of employee's injuries not altered by violations of business conduct requirements. —

Violations of legal requirements relative to the conduct of a business, should such exist, do not alter the work-related nature of the employee's injuries, and the employee is entitled to the benefit and subject to the restrictions of the worker's compensation laws. Mauch v. Stanley Structures, 641 P.2d 1247,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 309

(Wyo. 1982).

Employment not rendered unlawful by safety violations. —

The existence of Occupational Health and Safety Act (OHSA) violations under chapter 11 of this title does not render otherwise lawful employment unlawful. McKennan v. Wyoming Sawmills, 816 P.2d 1303,

1991 Wyo. LEXIS 144

(Wyo. 1991).

No connection with pension plans. —

Neither art. 10, § 4, Wyo. Const., nor this section have any connection with pension plans and were irrelevant where an employee's long-term disability payments pursuant to an insurance contract were reduced by a sum equal to the workmen's compensation award given to the employee. Bunney v. Standard Oil Co., 571 P.2d 981,

1977 Wyo. LEXIS 302

(Wyo. 1977).

Owner is generally not liable for injury to employees of independent contractor,

absent control over work details or the supervision of employees. Johnston v. Conoco, Inc., 758 P.2d 566,

1988 Wyo. LEXIS 99

(Wyo. 1988) (decided under former § 27-12-103).

Worker's compensation not bar to third-party indemnity claims. —

Because a third-party claim for indemnity is not based on the employee's injury, rather it is based on — “by reason of” — “on account of” — the alleged breach of an independent duty owed by the employer to the third party, and because third parties, seeking indemnity, received no benefits from passage of the worker's compensation provisions, these provisions do not bar third-party claims for indemnity. Pan Am. Petroleum Corp. v. Maddux Well Serv., 586 P.2d 1220,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 244

(Wyo. 1978).

Notwithstanding the immunity provided by this chapter, an employer that is otherwise protected by workers' compensation statutes against a claim resulting from injury of its employee can, nevertheless, contract away that protection and agree to indemnify a third-party against the claim. Nelson v. McAdams, Roux & Assocs., 688 F. Supp. 1502, 1988 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 6401 (D. Wyo. 1988).

Worker's compensation immunity does not bar third-party claims based upon implied indemnity. Gainsco Ins. Co. v. Amoco Prod. Co., 2002 WY 122, 53 P.3d 1051,

2002 Wyo. LEXIS 132

(Wyo. 2002).

“Scope of their employment” not distinguished from “course of employment.” —

For purposes of the Worker's Compensation Law, “scope of their employment,” as it appears in subsection (a) of this section, granting a fellow employee immunity from suit, and “course of employment,” as it appears in § 27-14-102(a)(xi), defining “injury,” should not be distinguished in meaning. Cottonwood Steel Corp. v. Hansen, 655 P.2d 1226,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 405

(Wyo. 1982).

Fellow employee immune from suit. —

A worker who is reimbursed for driving fellow employees to and from work is within the scope of his employment and, without a showing of culpable negligence, is immune, under subsection (a), from suit by those fellow employees following an automobile accident which occurred while the workers were on their way home from their place of employment. Cottonwood Steel Corp. v. Hansen, 655 P.2d 1226,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 405

(Wyo. 1982).

Supervisor who instructed a worker to continue operating a roof bolting machine that had a steering problem was entitled to co-employee immunity when the worker inadvertently drove under unbolted mine ceiling and was struck by falling rock; the worker had not said that the machine was unsafe to operate, and the evidence did not show intentional or reckless disregard for the worker's safety.
Loredo v. Solvay Am., Inc., 2009 WY 93, 212 P.3d 614,

2009 Wyo. LEXIS 106

(Wyo. 2009).

Immunity from suit on ground that company is statutory employer is affirmative defense. —

See Texas Gulf Sulphur Co. v. Robles, 511 P.2d 963,

1973 Wyo. LEXIS 170

(Wyo. 1973).

As to recovery against coemployee under former law,

see Markle v. Williamson, 518 P.2d 621,

1974 Wyo. LEXIS 183

(Wyo. 1974); Jordan v. Delta Drilling Co., 541 P.2d 39,

1975 Wyo. LEXIS 169

(Wyo. 1975), overruled, Wetering v. Eisele, 682 P.2d 1055,

1984 Wyo. LEXIS 296

(Wyo. 1984).

Negligent supervision requires knowledge of employee's actions. —

Culpability cannot be assessed against a supervisor or co-employee, from the injured employee's negligence in self-protection on disregard of work standards, in the absence of the defendant's actual knowledge or opportunity to correct by supervision. Smith v. Ensley, 752 P.2d 1374,

1988 Wyo. LEXIS 53

(Wyo. 1988) (decided under facts existing under prior law).

Employer liable for discharging employee with claim. —

An employee, injured in the course of his employment, has a cause of action against his employer for retaliatory discharge based upon a violation of the state's public policy, where the employer discharges the employee as a result of the employee's worker's compensation claim and the employee is not covered by the terms of a collective bargaining agreement. Griess v. Consolidated Freightways Corp., 776 P.2d 752,

1989 Wyo. LEXIS 163

(Wyo. 1989).

Grace period for contributions begins with next regular reporting date after injury. —

Where an employee was injured in the month immediately subsequent to the month of hire and prior to the reporting date for the month of hire, the calculation of the three-month grace period allowed by former § 27-12-103(c) for the late payment of contributions began with the next regular reporting date after the injury. As the employer paid the premiums for wages the employee earned in his month of hire well within this three-months' period, plus statutory penalties, he had to be considered as “contributing” to the fund, was not delinquent, and was therefore immune to suit. Mauler v. Titus, 697 P.2d 303,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 465

(Wyo. 1985).

Consolidated account for affiliated corporations required division approval. —

Under the pre-1986 provisions, affiliated corporations could report their payroll and pay their premiums under a single consolidated account. However, such an arrangement required the express approval and knowledge of the division to qualify as “contributing as required by this act,” as required by former § 27-12-103. Stratman v. Admiral Beverage Corp., 760 P.2d 974,

1988 Wyo. LEXIS 109

(Wyo. 1988), reh'g denied,

1988 Wyo. LEXIS 135

(Wyo. Sept. 20, 1988).

Derivative claims. —

Claim for intentional infliction of emotional distress, filed by survivors of employee killed in mining accident, was derivative of claim under Worker's Compensation Act and thus was properly dismissed. Anderson v. Solvay Minerals, Inc., 3 P.3d 236,

2000 Wyo. LEXIS 71

(Wyo. 2000), overruled in part, Collins v. COP Wyo., LLC, 2016 WY 18, 366 P.3d 521,

2016 Wyo. LEXIS 18

(Wyo. 2016).

Applied

in

Pace v. Hadley, 742 P.2d 1283,

1987 Wyo. LEXIS 511

(Wyo. 1987); SOS Staffing Servs., Inc. v. Fields, 2002 WY 141,

2002 Wyo. LEXIS 154

, 54 P.3d 761 (Wyo. 2002).

Cited

in

Northwinds of Wyo., Inc. v. Phillips Petro. Co., 779 P.2d 753,

1989 Wyo. LEXIS 195

(Wyo. 1989); Stephenson v. Pacific Power & Light Co., 779 P.2d 1169,

1989 Wyo. LEXIS 193

(Wyo. 1989); Baros v. Wells, 780 P.2d 341,

1989 Wyo. LEXIS 208

(Wyo. 1989); Harbel v. Wintermute, 883 P.2d 359,

1994 Wyo. LEXIS 129

(Wyo. 1994); Boyd v. Nation, 909 P.2d 323,

1996 Wyo. LEXIS 3

(Wyo. 1996); Streeter v. Amerequip Corp., 968 F. Supp. 624, 1997 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 9464 (D. Wyo. 1997); Franks v. Olson, 975 P.2d 588,

1999 Wyo. LEXIS 29

(Wyo. 1999); Terex Corp. v. Hough, 2002 WY 112, 50 P.3d 317,

2002 Wyo. LEXIS 118

(Wyo. 2002); Circle C Res., Inc. v. Kobielusz (In re Kobielusz), 2014 WY 35,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 36

(Mar 11, 2014).

Stated

in

Stuart v. Colo. Interstate Gas Co., 2001 U.S. App. LEXIS 25246, 271 F.3d 1221 (10th Cir. 2001).

Law reviews. —

For article “Governmental Immunity from Damage Actions in Wyoming — Part II,” see VII Land & Water L. Rev. 617 (1972).

For comment “Wyoming Contribution Among Joint Tortfeasors,” see IX Land & Water L. Rev. 589 (1974).

For case note, “Exclusivity Provisions of the Worker's Compensation Act as a Bar to Third-Party Actions Against Employers, Pan American Petroleum Corp. v. Maddux Well Service, 586 P.2d 1220,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 244

(Wyo. 1978),” see XIV Land & Water L. Rev. 587 (1979).

For case note, “Worker's Compensation — Constitutionality of Wyoming's Co-employee Immunity Statute under Article 10, Section 4, of the Wyoming Constitution.Meyer v. Kendig, 641 P.2d 1235,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 310

(Wyo. 1982),” see XVIII Land & Water L. Rev. 355 (1983).

For case note, “Worker's Compensation — Using the Exclusive Remedy Provision as a Shield for an Employer's Intentional Acts Against Employees. Baker v. Wendy's of Montana, Inc., 687 P.2d 885,

1984 Wyo. LEXIS 330

(Wyo. 1984),” see XXI Land & Water L. Rev. 603 (1986).

For case note, “Worker's Compensation — The Dilemma of Co-Employee Immunity and the Confusion in the Aftermath of Mills II. Mills v. Reynolds, 837 P.2d 48,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 92

(Wyo. 1992),” see XXVIII Land & Water L. Rev. 271 (1993).

For casenote, “Employment Discrimination — The After-Acquired Evidence Doctrine and its Effect on Recovery in Employment Discrimination Claims. McKennon v. Nashville Banner Publishing Co., 513 U.S. 352, 115 S. Ct. 879, 130 L. Ed. 2d 852, 1995 U.S. LEXIS 699 (1995),” see XXXI Land & Water L. Rev. 663 (1996).

For article, “Recreational Injuries and Inherent Risks: Wyoming's Recreation Safety Act: An Update,” see XXXIII Land & Water L. Rev. 249 (1998).

For article, “Reinstating Wyoming’s
Joint and Several Liability Paradigm: Protecting
Wyoming’s Workforce, Their
Families
And The Wyoming Worker’s Compensation
Fund From Uncompensated Injuries And Deaths”, see 8 Wyo. L. Rev. 87 (2008).

ARTICLE: Damned if You do, Damned if You Don't: A Contextual Analysis of Co-Employee Liability and Wyoming Workers' Compensation Subrogation, 16 Wyo. L. Rev. 415 (2016).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Liability of owner or operator of golf course or his insurer for injuries to caddies, 82 ALR2d 1183.

Right of employee to maintain common-law action for negligence against workmen's compensation insurance carrier, 93 ALR2d 598.

Right to maintain action against fellow employee for injury or death covered by workmen's compensation, 21 ALR3d 845.

Right to maintain malpractice suit against injured employee's attending physician notwithstanding receipt of workmen's compensation award, 28 ALR3d 1066.

Workmen's compensation provision as precluding employee's action against employer for fraud, false imprisonment, defamation or the like, 46 ALR3d 1279.

What conduct is willful, intentional or deliberate within workmen's compensation act provision authorizing tort action for such conduct, 96 ALR3d 1064.

Employer's right of action for loss of services or the like against third person tortiously killing or injuring employee, 4 ALR4th 504.

Workmen's compensation act as furnishing exclusive remedy for employee injured by product manufactured, sold, or distributed by employer, 9 ALR4th 873.

“Dual capacity doctrine” as basis for employee's recovery from employer in tort, 23 ALR4th 1151.

Workers' compensation immunity as extending to one owning controlling interest in employer corporation, 30 ALR4th 948.

Workers' compensation law as precluding employee's suit against employer for third person's criminal attack, 49 ALR4th 926.

Workers' compensation act as precluding tort action for injury to or death of employee's unborn child, 55 ALR4th 792.

Willful, wanton or reckless conduct of coemployee as ground of liability despite bar of workers' compensation law, 57 ALR4th 888.

“Dual capacity doctrine” as basis for employee's recovery for medical malpractice from company medical personnel, 73 ALR4th 115.

Workers' compensation: third-party tort liability of corporate officer to injured workers, 76 ALR4th 365.

Right to workers' compensation for injuries suffered after termination of employment, 10 ALR5th 245.

Workers' compensation: tips or gratuities as factor in determining amount of compensation, 16 ALR5th 191.

Pre-emption by workers' compensation statute of employee's remedy under state “whistleblower” statute, 20 ALR5th 677.

Scope of provision in liability policy issued to municipal corporation or similar governmental body limiting coverage to injuries arising out of construction, maintenance or repair work, 30 ALR5th 699.

Workers' compensation as precluding employee's suit against employer for sexual harassment in the workplace, 51 ALR5th 163.

Who are “public employers” or “public employees” within the meaning of state whistleblower protection acts, 90 ALR5th 687.

Contractual waiver of exclusivity of workers' compensation remedy, 117 ALR5th 441.

Postaccident conduct by employer, employer's insurer, or employer's employees in relation to workers' compensation claim as waiving, or estopping employer from asserting, exclusivity otherwise afforded by workers' compensation statute, 120 ALR 5th 513.

Right to workers' compensation for injury suffered at worker's home where home is claimed as “work situs”, 4 A.L.R.6th 57.

Library References.

Larson's Workers' Compensation Law § 111.03D (Matthew Bender).